California statutes. Financial Code
(c) A California state depository corporation of any class may merge into a federal depository corporation of another class, a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, or an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation of another class pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the surviving depository corporation is a federal depository corporation or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the surviving depository corporation is a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank or an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation, the law of the domicile of the foreign bank
 or foreign depository corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 168.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.5.

(a) No provision of Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), except the provisions of Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670) of Division 1.1, prohibits or restricts the merger of a California state bank or California industrial loan company.

(b) No provision of Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) prohibits or restricts the merger of a California state savings and loan association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 60.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

A merger is subject to the provisions of Section 1108 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 170.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.

A merger shall have the same effect as provided in Section 1107 of the Corporations Code and as provided in Section 4889 in the case of a merger of the type defined in Section 4880.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 172.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4904.

Promptly after a merger becomes effective, the surviving depository corporation shall:

(1) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued by the commissioner to the disappearing depository corporation; and

(2) File with the commissioner such report of the merger as the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4905.

(a) After a merger becomes effective, the surviving depository corporation may issue an officer’s certificate, stating that the disappearing depository corporation merged into the surviving depository corporation and specifying the time at which the merger became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the merger and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the merger and shall be conclusive
 evidence of the matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 173.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Merger of California State Independent Trust Company into Uninsured Foreign (Other State) Depository Corporation [4908.01. - 4908.10.]

4908.01.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “merger” means any of the mergers described in Section 4908.02.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 46.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.02.

With the approval of the commissioner, a California state independent trust company may merge into an uninsured foreign (other state) state depository corporation pursuant to this article and the law of the surviving depository corporation’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.03.

A merger is subject to the provisions of Section 1108 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 46.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.04.

A disappearing or surviving depository corporation shall file an application for approval of a merger with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.05.

A merger shall not become effective unless it has been approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.4.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.06.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a merger, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the shareholders’ equity of the surviving depository corporation will be adequate and that the financial condition of the surviving depository corporation will be satisfactory.

(b) That the directors and executive officers of the surviving depository corporation will be
 satisfactory.

(c) That the surviving depository corporation will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that it is reasonable to believe that the surviving depository corporation will be operated in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.

(d) That the merger will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this subdivision, in the case of any term of the merger that has been determined by agreement between the disappearing depository corporation and the surviving depository corporation in an arm’s-length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the disappearing depository corporation and the surviving depository corporation.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the
 merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.07.

After an application for approval of a merger has been approved and all conditions precedent to the merger have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.7.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.08.

A merger shall have the same effect as provided in Section 1107 of the Corporations Code and Section 4889 in the case of a merger of the type defined in Section 4880.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 46.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.09.

Promptly after a merger becomes effective, the surviving depository corporation shall:

(a) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued by the commissioner to the disappearing depository corporation.

(b) File with the commissioner any report regarding the merger that the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 521.8.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.10.

(a) After a merger becomes effective, the surviving depository corporation may issue an officers’ certificate, stating that the disappearing depository corporation merged into the surviving depository corporation and specifying the time at which the merger became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the merger and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the merger and shall be conclusive
 evidence of the matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 46.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Conversion [4920. - 4966.]



  ARTICLE 1. Conversion of California State Depository Corporation Into California State Depository Corporation [4920. - 4930.]

4920.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “conversion” means any of the conversions described in Section 4921.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 522.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4921.

With the approval of the commissioner, a California state depository corporation of any class may convert into a California state depository corporation of another class pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 523.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4922.

(a) A converting depository corporation shall adopt, and shall file with the commissioner an application for approval of, such amendments to its articles as may be necessary to carry out the conversion. Section 904 of the Corporations Code shall not apply to the amendments.

(b) A converting depository corporation shall adopt, and shall file with the commissioner an application for approval of, such amendments to its bylaws as may be necessary to carry out the conversion. The
 amendments shall not take effect until they are approved by the commissioner and the conversion becomes effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 524.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4923.

In obtaining the approval of outstanding shares or shareholders required for any amendment to articles or bylaws called for in Section 4922, a converting depository corporation shall provide to its shareholders information as the commissioner may require. In determining the information to be required, the commissioner shall give due consideration to regulations relating to proxy statements issued under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78n) by (a) the Securities and Exchange Commission, (b) in the case of a depository
 corporation that is a bank, the federal bank regulatory agencies, and (c) in the case of a depository corporation that is a savings association, the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 525.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4924.

A converting depository corporation shall file with the commissioner an application for approval of the conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 526.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4925.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a conversion, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the shareholders equity of the resulting depository corporation will be adequate and that the financial condition of the resulting depository corporation will be satisfactory.

(b) That the directors, executive officers, and any controlling person of the resulting
 corporation will be satisfactory.

(c) That the name of the resulting depository corporation will not resemble so closely as to be likely to cause confusion the name of any other bank, savings association, or industrial loan company, as the case may be, that is transacting or has recently transacted business in this state.

(d) That the resulting depository corporation will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that it is reasonable to believe that the resulting depository corporation will be operated in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.

(e) In the case of a conversion of a California state savings association, that the conversion will not have a seriously adverse effect on the total availability of financing for housing in any market area of the converting savings
 association in this state or that any effect of that type is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the conversion in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the commissioner to require the resulting depository corporation to make financing for housing available.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 527.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4927.

After an application for approval of a conversion has been approved and all conditions precedent to the conversion have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the amendments to the articles of the converting depository corporation called for in Section 4922, endorse the approval on the certificate of amendment or other instrument containing the amendments, and specify the time at which the certificate of amendment or other instrument is to be filed with the Secretary of State. The certificate of amendment or other instrument shall be filed with the
 Secretary of State at the time so specified by the commissioner, and at the time of the filing, the conversion shall become effective for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 529.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4928.

When a conversion becomes effective, the commissioner shall:

(a) (1) In case the resulting depository corporation is a California state bank, issue to the resulting depository corporation a certificate of authority authorizing it to transact commercial banking business or commercial banking business and trust business, as the case may be.

(2) In case the resulting depository corporation is a California state
 savings association, issue to the resulting depository corporation a license authorizing it to transact business as a state savings association.

(3) In case the resulting depository corporation is a California industrial loan company, issue to the resulting depository corporation a certificate of authority authorizing it to transact business as an industrial loan company.

(b) In any case, issue to the resulting depository corporation certificates of authority, licenses, or other appropriate authorizations for the branch offices, places of business, extensions of offices, and other facilities, if any, that the converting depository corporation was operating and that the resulting depository corporation is to continue to operate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 530.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4929.

Promptly after a conversion becomes effective, the resulting depository corporation shall:

(a) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued to the converting depository corporation by the commissioner; and

(b) File with the commissioner such report regarding the conversion as the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 531.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4930.

(a) After a conversion becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue, upon application, a certificate under his or her official seal, stating that the converting depository corporation converted into the resulting depository corporation and specifying the time at which the conversion became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the conversion and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the
 conversion and shall be conclusive evidence of such matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 532.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conversion of Federal Depository Corporation Into California State Depository Corporation [4940. - 4952.]

4940.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “conversion” means any of the conversions described in Section 4941.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 533.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4941.

With the approval of the commissioner:

(a) A national banking association may convert into a California state bank pursuant to this article and federal law.

(b) A federal depository corporation of any class may convert into a California state depository corporation of another class pursuant to federal law and this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 534.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4942.

A converting depository corporation shall adopt a plan of conversion pursuant to the provisions of federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4943.

In obtaining any approval of outstanding shares required for a plan of conversion, a converting depository corporation shall provide to its shareholders information as the commissioner may require. In determining the information to be required, the commissioner shall give due consideration to regulations relating to proxy statements issued under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78n) by (a) the Securities and Exchange Commission, (b) in the case of a depository corporation that is a bank, the federal bank regulatory agencies,
 and (c) in the case of a depository corporation that is a savings association, the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 535.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4944.

A converting depository corporation shall file the following with the commissioner:

(a) The plan of conversion.

(b) An officer’s certificate certifying that the plan of conversion has been approved as required by federal law.

(c) An application for approval of the conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 536.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4945.

If the commissioner finds all of the factors set forth in Section 4925 with respect to an application for approval of a conversion, the commissioner shall approve the application. If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 537.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4946.

After an application for approval of a conversion has been approved by the commissioner but before the conversion becomes effective, the converting depository corporation shall file with the commissioner an application for approval of the articles of the resulting depository corporation. When the commissioner approves the articles, the commissioner shall endorse the approval on the articles. After the articles are filed with the Secretary of State, the resulting depository corporation shall file with the commissioner a copy of the articles certified by the
 Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4948.

(a) After an application for approval of a conversion has been approved and all conditions precedent to the conversion have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall:

(1) In case the resulting depository corporation is a California state bank, issue to the resulting depository corporation a certificate of authority authorizing it to transact commercial banking business or commercial banking business and trust business, as the case may be.

(2) In case the resulting depository corporation is a California state savings association, issue to the resulting depository corporation a license authorizing it to transact business as a California state savings association.

(3) In case the resulting depository corporation is a California industrial loan company, issue to the resulting depository corporation a certificate of authority authorizing it to transact business as an industrial loan company.

(b) Upon the issuance of the certificate of authority or license pursuant to subdivision (a), the conversion shall become effective for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 540.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4949.

When a conversion becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue to the resulting depository corporation certificates of authority, licenses, or other appropriate authorizations for the branch offices, places of business, extensions of offices, and other facilities, if any, that the converting depository corporation was operating and that the resulting depository corporation is to continue to operate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 541.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4950.

When a conversion becomes effective:

(a) The converting depository corporation shall cease to exist.

(b) The resulting depository corporation shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of the converting depository corporation and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of the converting depository corporation in the same manner as if the resulting depository corporation had itself incurred them.

(c) All rights of creditors of
 the converting depository corporation and all liens upon the property of the converting depository corporation shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that such liens upon the property of the converting depository corporation shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time when the conversion becomes effective.

(d) Any action or proceeding pending by or against the converting depository corporation may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the resulting depository corporation, or the resulting depository corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in place of the converting depository corporation.

(e) Any reference to the converting depository corporation in any writing, whether executed or taking effect before or after the conversion, shall be deemed a reference to the resulting depository corporation if not inconsistent with the
 other provisions of such writing.

(f) In case the converting depository corporation was transacting trust business, the resulting depository corporation shall succeed, without further transfer, to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, deposits, demands, agreements, and trusts of the converting depository corporation under all trusts, executorships, administrations, guardianships, agencies, and all other fiduciary or representative capacities to the same extent as if the resulting depository corporation had originally assumed such fiduciary or representative capacities, and the resulting depository corporation shall be entitled to take and execute the appointment to all executorships, trusteeships, guardianships, and other fiduciary or representative capacities to which the converting depository corporation is or may be named in wills, whenever probated, or to which the converting depository corporation is or may be named or
 appointed by any other instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4951.

Promptly after a conversion becomes effective, the resulting depository corporation shall:

(a) Surrender to the regulator of the converting depository corporation for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued to the converting depository corporation by the regulator; and

(b) File with the regulator of the converting depository corporation such report regarding the conversion as the regulator may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4952.

(a) After a conversion becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue, upon application, a certificate under his or her official seal, stating that the converting depository corporation was converted into the resulting depository corporation and specifying the time at which the conversion became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the conversion and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the
 conversion and shall be conclusive evidence of such matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 543.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conversion of California State Depository Corporation Into Federal Depository Corporation [4960. - 4966.]

4960.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “conversion” means any of the conversions described in Section 4961.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 192.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4961.

(a) A California state bank may convert into a national banking association pursuant to this article and federal law.

(b) A California state depository corporation of any class may convert into a federal depository corporation of another class pursuant to this article and federal law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 194.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4961.5.

(a) No provision of Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), except the provisions of Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670) of Division 1.1, prohibits or restricts the conversion of a California state bank.

(b) No provision of Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) prohibits or restricts the conversion of a California state savings and loan association.

(c) No provision of Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), except the provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18660) of Division 7, prohibits or restricts the conversion of a California industrial loan
 company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 61.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4962.

(a) A converting depository corporation shall make a plan of conversion, stating:

(1) That the converting depository corporation shall be converted into the resulting depository corporation.

(2) Proposed articles of the resulting depository corporation.

(3) Manner of converting the securities of the converting depository corporation into securities of the resulting depository corporation.

(4) Such other provisions as may be appropriate.

(b) (1) The plan of conversion shall be approved by the board of the converting depository corporation, and the principal terms of the plan of conversion shall be approved by the outstanding shares of the converting depository corporation.

(2) (A) Any amendment to the plan of conversion shall be approved by the board of the converting depository corporation and, if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the plan of conversion, by the outstanding shares of the converting depository corporation.

(B) If the plan of conversion is amended and if the amendment is approved as required by subparagraph (A), the plan of conversion, as thus amended, shall constitute the plan of conversion.

(3) Any approval of the outstanding shares of the converting depository corporation required by this subdivision may be given before or after the approval of the board of the converting depository corporation.

(c) The board of the converting depository corporation may, in its discretion and without further approval of the outstanding shares, abandon the conversion at any time before the conversion becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4963.

A conversion shall have the same effect as provided in Section 4950 in the case of a conversion of the type defined in Section 4940.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 197.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4964.

Promptly after a conversion becomes effective, the resulting depository corporation shall:

(a) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued by the commissioner to the converting depository corporation; and

(b) File with the commissioner such report of the conversion as the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 544.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4965.

(a) After a conversion becomes effective, the resulting depository corporation may issue an officers’ certificate, stating that the converting depository corporation converted into the resulting depository corporation and specifying the time at which the conversion became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the conversion and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the conversion and shall be conclusive evidence of such matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for
 value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4966.

(a) Within 60 days after a conversion, the resulting depository corporation shall file with the Secretary of State an officers’ certificate reciting the name of the converting depository corporation, the name of the resulting depository corporation, the effective date of the conversion, and that the conversion has been completed in compliance with the provisions of federal law. The Secretary of State shall enter the fact of the conversion on the Secretary of State’s corporation records for the converting depository corporation, and the
 converting depository corporation shall thereafter not be deemed to be a corporation organized under the laws of this state.

(b) As to any conversion, whenever effected, if an officers’ certificate has not been filed pursuant to subdivision (a) within 60 days after the completion of the conversion, the commissioner may file a report with the Secretary of State setting forth, to the extent the commissioner has knowledge he or she considers reliable, the recitals specified in subdivision (a), and the Secretary of State shall record the fact of the conversion with the same effect as provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 545.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.7. COVERED LOANS [4970. - 4979.8.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [4970. - 4970.]

4970.

For purposes of this division:

(a) “Annual percentage rate” means the annual percentage rate for the loan calculated according to the provisions of the federal Truth in Lending Act and the regulations adopted thereunder by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.

(b) “Covered loan” means a consumer loan in which the original principal balance of the loan does not exceed the most current conforming loan limit for a single-family first mortgage loan established by the Federal National Mortgage Association in the case of a mortgage or deed of trust, and where one of the following conditions are met:

(1) For a mortgage or deed of trust, the annual percentage rate
 at consummation of the transaction will exceed by more than eight percentage points the yield on Treasury securities having comparable periods of maturity on the 15th day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the application for the extension of credit is received by the creditor.

(2) The total points and fees payable by the consumer at or before closing for a mortgage or deed of trust will exceed 6 percent of the total loan amount.

(c) “Points and fees” shall include the following:

(1) All items required to be disclosed as finance charges under Sections 1026.4(a) and 1026.4(b) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including the Official Staff Commentary, as amended from time to time, except interest.

(2) All compensation and
 fees paid to mortgage brokers in connection with the loan transaction.

(3) All items listed in Section 1026.4(c)(7) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, only if the person originating the covered loan receives direct compensation in connection with the charge.

(d) “Consumer loan” means a consumer credit transaction that is secured by real property located in this state used, or intended to be used or occupied, as the principal dwelling of the consumer that is improved by a one-to-four residential unit. “Consumer loan” does not include a reverse mortgage, an open line of credit as defined in Part 1026 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations (Regulation Z), or a consumer credit transaction that is secured by rental property or second homes. “Consumer loan” does not include a bridge loan. For purposes of this division, a bridge loan is any temporary loan, having a
 maturity of one year or less, for the purpose of acquisition or construction of a dwelling intended to become the consumer’s principal dwelling.

(e) “Original principal balance” means the total initial amount the consumer is obligated to repay on the loan.

(f) “Licensing agency” shall mean the Bureau of Real Estate for licensed real estate brokers, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for licensed residential mortgage lenders, licensed finance lenders and brokers, and the commercial and industrial banks and savings associations and credit unions organized in this state.

(g) “Licensed person” means a real estate broker licensed under the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code), a finance lender or broker licensed under the California
 Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000)), a residential mortgage lender licensed under the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000)), a commercial or industrial bank organized under the Banking Law (Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000)), a savings association organized under the Savings Association Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000)), and a credit union organized under the California Credit Union Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000)). This division shall not be construed to prevent any enforcement by a governmental entity against any person who originates a loan and who is exempt or excluded from licensure by all of the licensing agencies, based on a violation of any provision of this division. This division shall not be construed to prevent the Bureau of Real Estate from enforcing this division against a licensed salesperson employed by a licensed real estate broker as if that salesperson were a licensed person
 under this division. A licensed person includes any person engaged in the practice of consumer lending, as defined in this division, for which a license is required under any other provision of law, but whose license is invalid, suspended or revoked, or where no license has been obtained.

(h) “Originate” means to arrange, negotiate, or make a consumer loan.

(i) “Servicer” has the same meaning provided in Section 6(i)(2) of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 107.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Prohibited Acts [4973. - 4973.]

4973.

The following are prohibited acts and limitations for covered loans:

(a) (1) A covered loan shall not include a prepayment fee or penalty after the first 36 months after the date of consummation of the loan.

(2) A covered loan may include a prepayment fee or penalty up to the first 36 months after the date of consummation of the loan if:

(A) The person who originates the covered loan has also offered the consumer a choice of another product without a prepayment fee or penalty.

(B) The person who originates the covered loan has disclosed in writing to the consumer at least
 three business days prior to loan consummation the terms of the prepayment fee or penalty to the consumer for accepting a covered loan with the prepayment penalty and the rates, points, and fees that would be available to the consumer for accepting a covered loan without a prepayment penalty.

(C) The person who originates the covered loan has limited the amount of the prepayment fee or penalty to an amount not to exceed the payment of six months’ advance interest, at the contract rate of interest then in effect, on the amount prepaid in any 12-month period in excess of 20 percent of the original principal amount.

(D) A covered loan will not impose the prepayment fee or penalty if the covered loan is accelerated as a result of default.

(E) The person who originates the covered loan will not finance a prepayment
 penalty through a new loan that is originated by the same person.

(b) (1) A covered loan with a term of five years or less may not provide at origination for a payment schedule with regular periodic payments that when aggregated do not fully amortize the principal balance as of the maturity date of the loan.

(2) For a payment schedule that is adjusted to account for the seasonal or irregular income of the consumer, the total installments in any year shall not exceed the amount of one year’s worth of payments on the loan. This prohibition does not apply to a bridge loan. For purposes of this paragraph, “bridge loan” means a loan with a maturity of less than 18 months that only requires payments of interest until the time when the entire unpaid balance is due and payable.

(c) A covered loan shall
 not contain a provision for negative amortization such that the payment schedule for regular monthly payments causes the principal balance to increase, unless the covered loan is a first mortgage and the person who originates the loan discloses to the consumer that the loan contains a negative amortization provision that may add principal to the balance of the loan.

(d) A covered loan shall not include terms under which periodic payments required under the loan are consolidated and paid in advance from the loan proceeds.

(e) A covered loan shall not contain a provision that increases the interest rate as a result of a default. This provision does not apply to interest rate changes in a variable rate loan otherwise consistent with the provisions of the loan documents, provided the change in the interest rate is not triggered by the event of default or the acceleration for the
 indebtedness.
